Illinois, session 104th, HB5642.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 9Innovation and Technology:10PAYABLE FROM THE GENERAL REVENUE FUND11  For Personal Services..........................$107,206,10012  For State Contributions to Social Security.......$8,203,10013  Total                                          $115,409,200 14    Section 5. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 16the Department of Innovation and Technology for deposit into 17the DoIT Special Projects Fund for all costs and expenses 18associated with an Artificial Intelligence Innovation Program. 19    Section 10. The sum of $274,990,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Department of Innovation and Technology for   HB5642- 2 -OMB104 00194 LLG 10194 b1administrative and program expenses, including prior years' 2costs. 3    Section 15. The sum of $681,716,700, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the Technology 5Management Revolving Fund to the Department of Innovation and 6Technology for administrative and program expenses, including 7prior years' costs. 8    Section 20. The sum of $12,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the DoIT Special 10Projects Fund to the Department of Innovation and Technology 11for all ordinary and contingent expenses related to addressing 12cybersecurity risks and cybersecurity threats as authorized by 13Section 70612 of the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, 14(IIJA) and any associated federal guidance. 15    Section 25. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the DoIT Special 17Projects Fund to the Department of Innovation and Technology 18for all ordinary and contingent expenses related to an 19Artificial Intelligence Innovation Program. 20    Section 30. The sum of $17,500,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal Property 22Tax Replacement Fund to the Department of Innovation and   HB5642- 3 -OMB104 00194 LLG 10194 b1Technology for all costs associated with the Illinois Century 2Network and broadband projects. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42026.